Wisconsin, session 2025, SB753.
do enact as follows:SB753,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB753,210Section 2. 20.144 (3) (ti) of the statutes is created to read:SB753,2,181120.144 (3) (ti) College savings deposits; holding accounts; college savings 12program trust fund. From the college savings program trust fund, the amounts in 13the schedule for the department of financial institutions to fund deposits directly 14from this appropriation or indirectly from any master or interim holding account 15established by the department under the college savings program into accounts for 16children who were born or adopted in this state, reside in this state, and are 17designated beneficiaries of a college savings account under s. 224.50, to be used for 18qualified higher education expenses.SB753,319Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.SB753,3,420(1) Additional position. The authorized FTE positions for the department 21of financial institutions are increased by 1.0 SEG position, to be funded from the 22appropriation under s. 20.144 (3) (th), for the purpose of administering a program 23in which the department establishes master or interim holding accounts under the 1college savings program and makes deposits into accounts established for children 2who were born or adopted in this state, reside in this state, and are designated 3beneficiaries of a college savings account under s. 224.50, to be used for their 4qualified higher education expenses.SB753,45Section 4. Fiscal changes.SB753,3,176(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 7of financial institutions under s. 20.144 (3) (th), the dollar amount for fiscal year 82025-26 is increased by $446,900 to provide funding for the implementation and 9administration of a program in which the department establishes master or interim 10holding accounts under the college savings program and makes deposits into 11accounts established for children who were born or adopted in this state, reside in 12this state, and are designated beneficiaries of a college savings account under s. 13224.50, to be used for their qualified higher education expenses, and for the position 14authorized under Section 3 (1) of this act. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for 15the appropriation to the department of financial institutions under s. 20.144 (3) 16(th), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $317,900 to provide 17funding for the ongoing administration of the program described in this subsection.SB753,3,1818